District of Columbia statutes.
1-523.01

Mayoral nominees.

(a)

The Mayor shall nominate persons to serve as subordinate agency heads in the Executive Service established by subchapter X-A of Chapter 6 of this title [§ 1-610.51 et seq.], subject to the advice and consent of the Council, within 180 calendar days of the date of the establishment of the subordinate agency or the date of a vacancy. A nomination shall be submitted to the Council for a 90-day period of review, excluding days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the nomination by resolution within this 90-day review period, the nomination shall be deemed confirmed.

(1)

If the Mayor fails to nominate a person within 180 days of the establishment of the subordinate agency vacancy or the date of vacancy, no District funds may be expended to compensate any person serving in the position.

(2)

The Mayor may designate an acting subordinate agency head, but this designation shall not suspend the requirements of this section, or the provisions of § 1-610.59(a).

(b)

The Mayor shall not appoint board or commission members to serve in a position that the law requires to be filled by Mayoral appointment with the advice and consent of the Council.

(c)

No person shall serve in a hold-over capacity for longer than 180 days after the expiration of the term to which he or she was appointed, in a position that is required by law to be filled by Mayoral appointment with the advice and consent of the Council including to positions on boards and commissions.

(d)

The provisions of this section shall not be affected by any provision in subchapter VI of Chapter 3 of this title [§ 1-315.01 et seq.].

(e)

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Mayor shall transmit to the Council, for a 90-day period of review, excluding days of Council recess, nominations to the boards and commissions listed in this subsection. If the Council does not approve by resolution within the 90-day period a nomination to these boards or commissions, the nomination shall be deemed disapproved.

(1)

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Board, established by § 25-104(a);

(2)

The District of Columbia Board of Library Trustees, established by § 39-104;

(3)

The Board of Trustees of the University of the District of Columbia, established by § 38-1202.01;

(4)

The Board of Zoning Adjustment, established by § 6-641.07;

(5)

The Police Complaints Board, established by § 5-1104;

(6)

The Contract Appeals Board, established by § 2-360.01;

(7)

The District of Columbia Board of Elections and Ethics, established by § 1-1001.03;

(8)

The Commission on Human Rights, established by § 2-1404.01;

(9)

Repealed.

(10)

The District of Columbia Housing Finance Agency Board of Directors, established by § 42-2702.02;

(11)

The District of Columbia Lottery and Charitable Games Control Board, established by § 3-1301;

(12)

Repealed.

(13)

The Historic Preservation Review Board, established by Mayor’s Order 83-119, issued May 6, 1983 (30 DCR 3031) in accordance with § 6-1103;

(14)

The Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority Board of Directors, established by § 9-1006(e);

(15)

Repealed;

(16)

The Office of Employee Appeals, established by § 1-606.01;

(17)

The Public Employee Relations Board, established by § 1-605.01;

(18)

The Public Service Commission, established by § 34-801;

(19)

The Rental Housing Commission, established by § 42-3502.01;

(20)

The Washington Convention and Sports Authority Board of Directors, established by § 10-1202.05;

(21)

The Water and Sewer Authority Board of Directors, established by § 34-2202.04;

(22)

The Zoning Commission for the District of Columbia, established by § 6-621.01;

(23)

Repealed.

(24)

The District of Columbia Taxicab Commission, established by § 40-1704;

(25)

Repealed;

(26)

Repealed;

(27)

The Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia Housing Authority, established by § 6-211;

(28)

Repealed;

(29)

Homeland Security Commission established by § 7-2271.02;

(30)

Commission on Fashion Arts and Events, established by § 3-651;

(31)

The Board of Ethics and Government Accountability, established by § 1-1162.02; provided, that a nomination to the Board of Ethics and Government Accountability shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, pursuant to § 1-1162.03(b)(1); and

(32)

Commission on the Arts and Humanities, established by § 39-203.

(f)

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Mayor shall transmit to the Council, for a 45-day period of review, excluding days of Council recess, nominations to the boards and commissions listed in this subsection. The Council shall be deemed to have approved a nomination under this subsection if during the 45-day period, no member introduces a resolution disapproving the nomination. If a member introduces a resolution disapproving the nomination within the 45-day period, the Council shall have an additional 45 days, excluding days of Council recess, to disapprove the nomination by resolution, or it will be deemed approved.

(1)

The Apprenticeship Council, established by § 32-1402;

(2)

The Armory Board, established by § 3-302;

(3)

Repealed;

(4)

The Board of Dentistry, established by § 3-1202.01;

(5)

The Board of Medicine, established by § 3-1202.03;

(6)

The Board of Nursing, established by § 3-1202.04;

(7)

The Board of Nursing Home Administration, established by § 3-1202.05;

(8)

The Board of Psychology, established by § 3-1202.11;

(9)

Repealed.

(10)

The Child Support Guideline Commission, established by § 16-916.02;

(11)

Repealed;

(12)

The District of Columbia Boxing and Wrestling Commission, established by § 3-604;

(13)

The Multistate Tax Commission, established by § 47-441;

(14)

The Public Access Corporation Board of Directors, established by § 34-1253.02;

(15)

The Board of Real Estate, established by § 47-2853.06(h);

(16)

Repealed;

(17)

The Board of Dietetics and Nutrition, established by § 3-1202.02;

(18)

The Board of Occupational Therapy, established by § 3-1202.06;

(19)

The Board of Optometry, established by § 3-1202.07;

(20)

The Board of Pharmacy, established by § 3-1202.08;

(21)

The Board of Physical Therapy, established by § 3-1202.09;

(22)

The Board of Podiatry, established by § 3-1202.10;

(23)

The Board of Social Work, established by § 3-1202.12;

(24)

The Board of Professional Counseling, established by § 3-1202.13;

(25)

The Board of Respiratory Care, established by § 3-1202.14;

(26)

The Board of Massage Therapy, established by § 3-1202.15;

(27)

The Board of Chiropractic, established by § 3-1202.16;

(28)

The Statewide Health Coordinating Council, established by § 44-403;

(29)

The Board of Barber and Cosmetology, established by § 47-2853.06(c);

(30)

The Board of Real Estate Appraisers, established by § 47-2853.06(g);

(31)

Repealed;

(32)

The Board of Funeral Directors, established by § 47-2853.06(f);

(33)

Repealed;

(34)

Repealed;

(35)

The Board of Veterinary Examiners for the District of Columbia, established by § 3-505 [repealed];

(36)

Reserved;

(37)

The Board of Architecture and Interior Designers, established by § 47-2853.06(a);

(38)

The Board of Accountancy, established by § 47-2853.06(b);

(39)

The Board of Industrial Trades, established by § 47-2853.06(d);

(40)

The Board of Professional Engineering, established by § 47-2853.06(e);

(41)

The Housing and Community Development Reform Commission, established by § 6-1032;

(42)

The Commission on Asian and Pacific Islander Community Development, established by § 2-1373;

(43)

The Board of Marriage and Family Therapy, established by § 3-1202.17;

(44)

Repealed;

(45)

Repealed;

(46)

The Motor Vehicle Theft Prevention Commission, established by § 3-1352;

(47)

The Commission on African Affairs, established by § 2-1393;

(48)

The Science Advisory Board to the Department of Forensic Sciences, established by § 5-1501.11;

(49)

The Commission on African-American Affairs, established by § 3-1441;

(50)

[Not funded];

(51)

Other Post-Employment Benefits Fund Advisory Committee, established by § 1-621.51;

(52)

The Commission on Fathers, Men, and Boys established pursuant to § 3-731;

(53)

The Commission on Health Disparities; and

(54)

Youth Apprenticeship Advisory Committee, established by § 32-1412.01.

(g)

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Mayor shall directly appoint members to boards and commissions, without the advice and consent of the Council, to the boards and commissions not contained in subsections (e) and (f) of this section.

(h)

This section shall not apply to positions on boards and commissions that are designated by law for the Mayor, his or her designee, or another member of the executive branch or his or her designee.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-142, § 2, 25 DCR 6112
Mar. 4, 1981, D.C. Law 3-131, § 802, 28 DCR 326
Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-201, § 3, 36 DCR 248
May 10, 1989, D.C. Law 7-231, § 4, 36 DCR 492
Oct. 15, 1993, D.C. Law 10-39, § 2, 40 DCR 5827
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1245, 46 DCR 3142
June 12, 1999, D.C. Law 12-285, § 2, 46 DCR 1355
Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-38, § 1103, 46 DCR 6373
Oct. 14, 1999, D.C. Law 13-49, §§ 3, 15, 46 DCR 5153
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 111, 47 DCR 520
May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-105, § 28, 47 DCR 1325
June 19, 2001, D.C. Law 13-313, § 3, 48 DCR 1873
July 12, 2001, D.C. Law 14-18, § 9(c), 48 DCR 4047
Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 308, 48 DCR 6981
Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190,§ 1148, 49 DCR 6968
Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-88, § 3, 50 DCR 10999
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, §§ 15, 18, 51 DCR 881
Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-216, § 3, 51 DCR 9123
Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-219, § 201(b), 51 DCR 9142
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 2, 52 DCR 2638
Apr. 7, 2006, D.C. Law 16-91, § 116, 52 DCR 10637
Nov. 16, 2006, D.C. Law 16-187, § 221, 53 DCR 6722
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 115, 53 DCR 6794
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-262, § 409, 54 DCR 794
Feb. 6, 2008, D.C. Law 17-108, § 202, 54 DCR 10993
Apr. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-148, § 5, 55 DCR 2219
July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-197, § 10(a), 55 DCR 6277
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, §§ 127(b), 175, 208, 233, 249, 56 DCR 1117
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2082(a), 57 DCR 181
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-363, § 3(a), 58 DCR 963
Aug. 17, 2011, D.C. Law 19-18, § 18, 58 DCR 5403
Mar. 14, 2012, D.C. Law 19-106, § 4, 59 DCR 440
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 203, 59 DCR 6190
June 10, 2014, D.C. Law 20-108, § 3(a), 61 DCR 3892
July 15, 2014, D.C. Law 20-121, § 12, 61 DCR 5680
July 15, 2014, D.C. Law 20-122, § 3, 61 DCR 5688
Dec. 17, 2014, D.C. Law 20-151, § 3, 61 DCR 8893
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 1075, 7005, 61 DCR 9990
Mar. 10, 2015, D.C. Law 20-192, § 6, 61 DCR 12403
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, §§ 232, 311, 62 DCR 1884
May 12, 2016, D.C. Law 21-109, § 3, 63 DCR 4319, 21 DCSTAT 3049
Director of the Department of Public Health, appointment, see § 7-153.
Director of the Office of Contracting and Procurement, nomination and confirmation, see § 2-301.05e.
Non-health related occupations and professions licensure boards, nominations and appointments, see § 47-2853.07.
This section is referenced in § 1-301.82, § 1-301.191, § 1-603.01, § 1-610.51, § 1-1161.01, § 1-1171.01, § 2-218.21, § 2-352.03, § 2-1373, § 2-1374, § 2-1404.03, § 2-1431.03, § 2-1515.02, § 3-652, § 3-1353, § 3-1442, § 4-756.03, § 5-105.01, § 5-129.21, § 5-402, § 5-1402, § 5-1501.03, § 5-1501.11, § 6-1032, § 7-153, § 7-761.06, § 7-771.04, § 7-1141.03, § 7-2271.02, § 8-151.04, § 10-551.03, § 10-1202.05, § 24-1302, § 24-1303, § 31-3171.05, § 34-1252.01, § 38-174, § 38-191, § 38-2601, § 39-203, § 42-2702.02, § 47-2853.07, § 49-1002, and § 50-921.02.
1981 Ed., § 1-633.7.
1973 Ed., § 1-362.7.
Section 4(c) of D.C. Law 20-108 was repealed by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7005.
D.C. Law 13-38, in subsec. (e), in the first sentence of the introductory paragraph, substituted “paragraphs (1)-(26)” for “paragraphs (1)-(24)”, and added pars. (25) and (26).
D.C. Law 13-49, in par. (20) of subsec. (e), substituted “§ 9-806” for § 9-803“; in par. (3) of subsec. (f), substituted ”Mayor’s Order 96-27, issued March 5, 1996 ( 43 DCR 1367)“ for ”Mayor’s Order 94-115, issued May 9, 1994 ( 41 DCR 2864)“; validated previously made technical amendments; and repealed pars. (31), (33), and (34) of subsec. (f), which previously read:
“(31) The Board of Chiropractic, established by § 2-3302.16;”
“(33) The Board of Respiratory Care, established by § 2-3302.14;
“(34) The Board of Social Work, established by § 2-3302.12; and”.
D.C. Law 13-91, in subsec. (a), substituted “§ 1-611.51” for “§ 1-611.1”; and in subsec. (f), in par. (15), substituted “The Board of Real Estate, established by § 47-2853.6(h)” for “The Real Estate Commission of the District of Columbia, established by § 45-1923”, in par. (29), substituted “The Board of Barber and Cosmetology, established by § 47-2853.6(c)” for “The Barber and Cosmetology Board, established by § 2-422”, in par. (30), substituted “The Board of Real Estate Appraisers, established by § 47-2853.6(g)” for “The Board of Appraisers, established by § 45-3202”, in par. (32), substituted “The Board of Funeral Directors, established by § 47-2853.6(f)” for “The Board of Funeral Directors, established by § 2-2803”, in par. (35), inserted “for the District of Columbia”, and added pars. (37) to (40).
D.C. Law 13-105, in subsec. (e), in the first sentence of the introductory paragraph, substituted “paragraphs (1)-(27)” for “paragraphs (1)-(26)”, in par. (25), deleted “and” from the end, in par. (26), added “and”, and added par. (27).
D.C. Law 13-313 repealed par. (16) of subsec. (f) which had read:
“(16) The Sex Offender Registration Advisory Council, established by § 22-4103;”
D.C. Law 14-18 repealed par. (9) of subsec. (e) which had read:
“(9) The Health and Hospitals Public Benefit Corporation Board of Directors, established by § 44-1102.03;”
D.C. Law 15-354, in subsec. (e), substituted “in this subsection” for “in paragraphs (1)-(27) of this subsection”; in subsec. (f), substituted “in this subsection” for “in paragraphs (1)-(42) of this subsection”, and repealed par. (3) which had read:
“(3) The Board of Appeals and Review, established by Mayor’s Order 96-27, issued March 5, 1996 ( 43 DCR 1367);”
Section 308 of D.C. Law 14-28, in subsec. (f), substituted “(42)” for “(41)” in the introductory paragraph, made nonsubstantive changes to pars. (40) and (41), and added par. (42).
Section 1148 of D.C. Law 14-190, in subsec. (f), made nonsubstantive changes in pars. (39) and (40), and added par. (41).
D.C. Law 15-88, in subsec. (f), made nonsubstantive changes in pars. (41) and (42), and added par. (43).
D.C. Law 15-105, in subsec. (a), substituted “subchapter X-A of Chapter 6 of this title” for “§ 1-610.51”; in par. (14) of subsec. (f), substituted “§ 34-1253.02” for “§ 34-1229”; and, in pars. (40), (41), and (42) of subsec. (f), validated previously made technical corrections.
D.C. Law 15-216 rewrote par. (8) of subsec. (e) which had read:
“(8) The District of Columbia Commission on Human Rights, established by Commission on Human Rights Order, issued July 8, 1971 (C.O. 71-224).”
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 substituted “§ 2-360.01” for “§ 2-309.01” in (e)(6); and repealed (e)(15), (e)(25), (e)(26), and (e)(28).
D.C. Law 15-219, in subsec. (e), substituted ‘(1)-(28)‘ for ‘(1)-(27)‘ in the lead-in text, deleted ‘and‘ following the semicolon in par. (26), substituted ‘; and‘ for a period in par. (27), and added par. (28).
D.C. Law 16-91, in par. (e)(5), substituted ‘Police Complaints‘ for ‘Citizen Complaint Review‘; repealed par. (e)(23); and added par. (f)(44).
D.C. Law 16-187, in subsec. (f), deleted ‘and‘ from the end of par. (43), substituted ‘; and‘ for a period at the end of par. (44), and added par. (45).
D.C. Law 16-191, in pars. (42) and (43) of subsec. (f), validated previously made technical corrections.
D.C. Law 16-262, in subsec. (e), added par. (29).
D.C. Law 17-148, in subsec. (e), added par. (30).
D.C. Law 17-108, in subsec. (a)(2), inserted ‘, or the provisions of § 1-610.59(a)‘.
D.C. Law 17-197, in subsec. (f), deleted ‘and‘ from the end of par. (44), substituted ‘; and‘ for a period at the end of par. (45), and added par. (46).
D.C. Law 17-353 , in subsec. (e)(30), substituted ‘Events, established by § 3-651‘ for ‘Events‘, in subsec. (f), deleted ‘; and‘ from the end of par. (45); substituted ‘; and‘ for a period at the end of par. (46), and added par. (47), and validated previously made technical corrections in subsecs. (f)(28), (42), (43), (45).
D.C. Law 18-111 repealed subsec. (e)(12); and, in subsec. (e)(20), substituted ‘Washington Convention and Sports Authority‘ for ‘Washington Convention Center Authority‘. Prior to repeal, subsec. (e)(12) read as follows:
‘(12) The District of Columbia Sports Commission Board of Directors, established by § 3-1404;‘.
D.C. Law 18-363 repealed subsec. (f)(9), which formerly read:
‘(9) The Board of Real Property Assessments and Appeals, established by § 47-825.01;‘
D.C. Law 19-18, in subsec. (f), added par. (48).
D.C. Law 19-106 added subsec. (f)(49).
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-108 repealed (f)(44).
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-121 made minor stylistic changes in (f)(48) and (f)(49); and added (f)(50).
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-122 made minor stylistic changes in (e)(29) and (e)(30); and added (e)(31).
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-151 added (f)(51) and made related changes.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 repealed (f)(44); and added the subsection designated herein as (f)(52).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-192 repealed (f)(44); and added the subsection designated herein as (f)(53).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-271 added (e)(32) and made related changes; and repealed (f)(11) and (f)(45).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Confirmation Holdover Temporary Amendment Act of 1993 (D.C. Law 10-21, September 30, 1993, 41 DCR 7214).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Board of Trustees of the University of the District of Columbia Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-95, April 12, 2000, law notification 47 DCR 2846).
Section 2 of D.C. Law 16-215, in subsec. (f), in par. (43), struck “and” at the end, in par. (44) substituted “; and” for the period, and added par. (45) to read as follows:
“(45) The Commission on African Affairs, established by section 4 of the Office and Commission on African Affairs Act of 2006, effective June 8, 2006 (D.C. Law 16-111; D.C. Official Code § 2-1393).”
Section 5(b) of D.C. Law 16-215 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
Section 3 of D.C. Law 19-75, in subsec. (b), substituted “; provided, that the Mayor is authorized to make new interim appointments of members serving on the Board of Real Property Assessments and Appeals, established by D.C. Official Code § 47-825.01, as of October 1, 2011, who may continue to serve in that capacity until the Chairperson and Vice-Chairperson for the Real Property Tax Appeals Commission for the District of Columbia have been approved by the Council and appointed by the Mayor in accordance with D.C. Official Code § 47-825.01a(a)(1)(F).” for a period at the end.
Section 8(b) of D.C. Law 19-75 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2 of the Confirmation Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-25, March 15, 1999, 46 DCR 2971).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Confirmation Act Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-92, June 4, 1999, 46 DCR 5330).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 1103 of the Service Improvement and Fiscal Year 2000 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-110, July 28, 1999, 46 DCR 6320).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 3 of the Board of Trustees of the University of the District of Columbia Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-210, December 17, 1999, 47 DCR 9).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 27 of the District of Columbia Housing Authority Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-259, February 9, 2000, 47 DCR 1129).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 3 of the Board of Trustees of the University of the District of Columbia Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-280, March 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2022).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 27 of the District of Columbia Housing Authority Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-346, June 5, 2000, 47 DCR 4980).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1148 of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-453, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8026).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 201(b) of Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-586, November 1, 2004, 51 DCR 10681).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Office and Commission on African Affairs Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-501, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 9051).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Office and Commission on African Affairs Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-5, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1448).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2082(a) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2082(a) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Real Property Tax Appeals Commission Establishment Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-169, October 11, 2011, 58 DCR 8905).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Real Property Tax Appeals Commission Establishment Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-256, December 21, 2011, 58 DCR 11219).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1075 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1075 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see §§ 232 and 311 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-481, November 18, 2014, 61 DCR 12133, 20 STAT 4405).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1075 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see §§  232 and 311 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 STAT 807).
Amendment of Organization Order No. 112, establishing Board of Appeals and Review: See Mayor’s Order 84-31, February 9, 1984.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-108: Section 4(a) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that applications pending as of June 10, 2014, shall not be subject to the provisions of the act.

Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 20-108(b) provided that, except as provided in § 2-218.46(f), contracts existing or pending as of June 10, 2014, shall not be affected by the provisions of the act.

Section 4(c) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 12 of D.C. Law 20-121 would have added a new (f)(50), concerning the Lactation Commission.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-121: Section 13 of D.C. Law 20-121, codified as § 7-881.11, provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 4(c) of D.C. Law 20-108 was repealed by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7005.